District of Columbia statutes.
42-521

Estates from month to month or from quarter to quarter.

An estate may be from month to month or from quarter to quarter, or, as otherwise expressed, it may be by the month or by the quarter, if so expressed in writing.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1352, ch. 854, § 1035
1973 Ed., § 45-821.
1981 Ed., § 45-221.